North Carolina, session 2025, SB647.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) NC Pre-K Expansion. – There is appropriated from the General
Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and
Early Education, the sum of ninety million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($90,250,000) in
recurring funds for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to continue implementing the prekindergarten
program (NC Pre-K). These funds shall be used to increase the number of slots available in the
program to 10,000 over the next three years as follows: 3,000 in year one; 3,500 in year two; and
3,500 in year three. The NC Pre-K program shall serve children who are 4 years of age on or
before August 31 of the program year. In determining eligibility, the Division shall establish
income eligibility requirements for the program at or below three hundred percent (300%) of the
federal poverty level. All sites established under this section shall achieve and maintain a 4- or
5-star rating. The Division may use up to three percent (3%) of these funds each fiscal year of
the fiscal biennium for administrative expenses associated with implementing the provisions of
this section.
SECTION 1.(b) There is appropriated from the Economic Development Reserve
Fund in the Department of Commerce and available ARPA funds to the Division of Child
Development and Early Education (DCDEE) the sum of six million eight hundred thousand
dollars ($6,800,000) in recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to
administer a grant program for childcare facilities, new or existing, in census tracts where the
ratio of children under 5 to licensed child care providers exceeds 3:1. Childcare facilities with
20-49 children are eligible to receive a grant of up to one hundred fifty thousand dollars
($150,000); 50-74 up to three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000); 75 or more up to five
hundred thousand dollars ($500,000); and family childcare homes up to fifty thousand dollars
*S647-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
($50,000). Grant recipients shall provide a fifteen percent (15%) match and shall commit to
provide the services for at least five years. Of the funds appropriated in this act, the sum of three
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) in each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium
shall be used to employ one full-time program manager and two full-time specialists and the sum
of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) may be used for technical assistance. DCDEE
shall consult with the Department of Commerce in administering the grant program.
SECTION 1.(c) The Division of Child Development and Early Education shall
coordinate with other appropriate divisions in the Department of Health and Human Services to
develop modernized inspections standards for childcare centers. Inspections shall be conducted
on a biannual basis for 4- and 5-star childcare centers and an electronic checklist system shall be
made available to providers. Inspection standards shall include reasonable space requirements
for both indoor and outdoor and allow for expedited review for expansions by providers with
three or more years in good standing. DCDEE shall implement the modernized standards required
by this section over a period of eighteen months. DCDEE shall use funds available to it to
implement the provisions of this subsection.
SECTION 1.(d) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Division of
Child Development and Early Education (DCDEE) the sum of nine million five hundred
sixty-two thousand five hundred dollars ($9,562,500) in recurring funds and from the North
Carolina Education Lottery Fund the sum of three million one hundred eighty-seven thousand
five hundred dollars ($3,187,500) for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to administer a grant
program for after school programs in public schools where more than fifty percent (50%) of the
students receive free or reduced lunch. After school programs funded under this section shall
operate at a minimum of three hours a day five days a week, and shall provide academic support
and transportation home from the site. Students participating may be charged a fee, but it shall
be based on family income. DCDEE shall work in conjunction with the Department of Public
Instruction to establish the administrative guidelines for the grant program and in reporting on
attendance and improvements in academic outcomes. The report required by this section shall be
made to the Department of Health and Human Services, Department of Public Instruction, the
Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Education, and the Fiscal Research Division. Of the funds appropriated
in this section, the sum of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) in each fiscal year of the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall be used to employ three full-time program coordinators and one
full-time director for the program.
SECTION 2.(a) The maximum gross annual income for initial eligibility, adjusted
annually, for subsidized child care services shall be determined based on a percentage of the
federal poverty level as follows:
AGE INCOME PERCENTAGE LEVEL
0 – 5 300%
6 – 12 133%
Fees for families who are required to share in the cost of care are established based
on seven percent (7%) of gross family income. Priority populations under this section are foster
children, children with disabilities, and homeless children.
SECTION 2.(b) The Division of Child Development and Early Education shall use
available funds from the Child Care and Development Fund to implement the following scale for
determining childcare subsidy eligibility for the 2026-2027 fiscal year:
(1) 100-200% FPL – standard subsidy (7% family contribution)
(2) 201-220% FPL – 90% of standard subsidy (9% family contribution)
(3) 221-240% FPL – 80% of standard subsidy (11% family contribution)
(4) 241-260% FPL – 70% of standard subsidy (13% family contribution)
(5) 261-280% FPL – 60% of standard subsidy (15% family contribution)
(6) 281-300% FPL – 50% of standard subsidy (17% family contribution)
Page 2 Senate Bill 647-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.(c) For each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, a taxpayer with
children under six years of age and an income between 300-400% of the federal poverty level is
allowed a deduction of $1,500 for each qualifying child. For a child with disabilities, the
deduction shall be increased by $500; for an infant under twelve months, by $500; for a child in
a childcare desert, by $250.
SECTION 2.(d) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services the sum of twenty-two million nine hundred thousand dollars
($22,900,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to provide funds to
on-site childcare providers to construct new and renovate existing childcare facilities and to
provide childcare subsidies to employees of the providers. These funds shall be available only to
providers with 10 or more employees.
SECTION 3.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund and the Child Care
and Development Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child
Development and Early Education, the sum of nine hundred fifty thousand dollars ($950,000) in
recurring funds for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to enhance the
compensation paid to educators in licensed childcare facilities. The supplement shall be provided
to educators who work a minimum of 30 hours each week and shall be allocated as follow: (i)
$2,000 annually for CDA credentials; $3,500 annually for an associate's degree; $5,000 annually
for a bachelor's degree; and $6,500 annually for a master's degree. The supplement shall be paid
on a biweekly basis. An additional supplement shall be paid for infant-toddler specialization in
the amount of $1,000 annually; bilingual certification $1,000 annually; and rural location $1,500
annually.
SECTION 3.(b) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child
Development and Early Education, shall implement 5-star rating system reforms by reducing
documentation required to be submitted on a biannual basis; incorporate classroom assessment
tools, such as CLASS and ERS; streamline staff qualification verifications; and increase subsidy
reimbursement differentials.
SECTION 3.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund and the Child Care
and Development Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child
Development and Early Education, the sum of one million eight hundred thousand dollars
($1,800,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to administer a mentorship
program for childcare providers seeking a star-level increase. Mentors shall have at least five or
more years' experience working in a 4- or 5-star childcare facility and shall hold at a minimum a
bachelor's degree.
SECTION 4.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund and the Child Care
and Development Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child
Development and Early Education, the sum of two million eight hundred thousand dollars
($2,800,000) in nonrecurring funds for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to
provide retention bonuses to full-time childcare facility employees in licensed facilities. An
employee with two years of service is eligible for a bonus of $1,000 each year; five years of
service $2,500 each year; 10 years of service $5,000 each year; 15 years of service $7,000 each
year; 20 years of service $10,000 each year.
SECTION 4.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund and the Child Care
and Development Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child
Development and Early Education, the sum of two million eight hundred thousand dollars
($2,800,000) in nonrecurring funds for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to
administer a professional development program for childcare workers. The program shall include
providing career advise to childcare workers, professional development programs, leadership
training for directors, and an online tracking and verification system.
SECTION 4.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund and the Child Care
and Development Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child
Senate Bill 647-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Development and Early Education, the sum of nine million dollars ($9,000,000) in recurring
funds for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to expand T.E.A.C.H. scholarships.
The amount of the scholarships shall be as follows: for CDA, 80% of costs up to $3,000;
associate's degree, 80% of costs up to $4,500; and bachelor's degree, 80% of costs up to $6,000.
Scholarship recipients shall commit to continued employment in a childcare facility for at least
one year after completing their degree.
SECTION 4.(d) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child
Development and Early Education, shall develop and administer an apprenticeship program for
individuals desiring to work in the childcare industry. The program shall provide for at least
2,000 hours on hand-on experience in a childcare facility, at least 144 hours of technical
instruction on childcare; a starting wage of at least $13 per hour; and the apprenticeship shall last
between 12-18 months. This program shall be funded by using federal apprenticeship funds, State
workforce development funds, and General Fund monies.
SECTION 5.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, the sum of
five million dollars ($5,000,000) in recurring funds for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium to enter into public-private partnerships with childcare facility owners to construct and
renovate childcare facilities, purchase equipment and materials, provide professional
development initiatives, and provide quality enhancement projects. A facility owner shall
contribute a minimum of $25,000 for each project and the State a maximum of $500,000 for each
project.
SECTION 5.(b) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child
Development and Early Education, in collaboration with the Department of Public Instruction
shall administer a grant program to expand school-based care facilities. Eligible projects include
elementary school classroom conversions, installing modular units on school property, and
creating shared service arrangements with existing service providers.
SECTION 5.(c) Using funds from the Child Care and Development Fund and funds
appropriated from the General Fund for this purpose, the Department of Health and Human
Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, shall establish 12 regional
hub-and-spoke support networks for family childcare. The networks shall share administrative
services such as billing and enrollment, substitute pool management, bulk purchasing,
professional development, business coaching and support, and quality improvement assistance.
This program shall be funded by using available funds from Child Care and Development Fund
and funds from the General Fund appropriated for this purpose.
SECTION 5.(d) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child
Development and Early Education, shall develop and administer a universal Pre-K pilot program.
The pilot program shall be conducted in 5 counties selected by the Division as long as they meet
the following: one urban with a population of less than 500,000; two suburban with a population
of 100,000 or more but less than 500,000; and two rural counties with a population of less than
100,000. The pilot program shall provide for universal eligibility of all 4 years olds in the State;
a mixed delivery system of public schools, Head Start, and private childcare centers; a full day
of 6 hours or more required; standardized quality requirements across setting; and a common
enrollment system. The pilot program shall be funded with funds from the General Funds with a
match of fifteen percent (15%) provided by the counties in which the pilot program will be
conducted.
SECTION 6.(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child
Development and Early Education, shall set aside twenty percent (20%) of the additional subsidy
dollars provided in this act to be given to parents who have infants and toddlers in a childcare
facility. Funds shall also be used to fund one family engagement navigator in each county to
assist with enrollment and to provide for a comprehensive database of all ECE professionals.
This program shall be funded from CCDF funds and the General Fund.
Page 4 Senate Bill 647-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 6.(b) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child
Development and Early Education, shall implement a program to assist businesses providing
childcare. The program shall include (i) fast tracking licensure with a 14-day review for employer
sponsored centers; tax credits of at least $1,000 per employee for providing flexible work hours
(at least 20% of the workforce must participate); and regional childcare coordinators.
SECTION 7. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Senate Bill 647-First Edition Page 5